Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2323.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "eligible member" and "promissory note" in section 3201 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible member." A member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or of a reserve component of any branch of the United States Armed Forces who meets the criteria specified in section 123456789101112131415161718 3202 (relating to eligibility) and who has been awarded a certificate of eligibility under section 3203 (relating to certification of eligibility).* * *"Promissory note." A written contract signed by [a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard] an eligible member in which the member promises to repay the awarded grant amount.* * * Section 2. Section 3202(a) introductory paragraph and (2), (b)(2), (c.1) and (d) introductory paragraph and (2) of Title 51, amended July 7, 2025 (P.L.108, No.32), are amended and subsections (a) and (b) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 3202. Eligibility.(a) General rule.--A member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or of a reserve component of any branch of the United States Armed Forces is eligible to receive an educational assistance grant under this subchapter if the member meets all of the following eligibility criteria:(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) and section [3206(b)] 3206(b.1) (relating to limitations), the member is a member in good standing and has been a satisfactory participant in Pennsylvania National Guard or United States Armed Forces reserve activities for a minimum service period established by the Adjutant General.(2.1) If the member is a member of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces, the member is a resident of this Commonwealth.* * *(b) Additional eligibility criteria for full-time 20260HB2323PN3098 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 educational assistance grants.--In addition to the eligibility criteria specified in subsection (a), an eligible member must meet the following eligibility criteria to qualify for a full-time educational assistance grant:(2) [The] If the eligible member is a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard, the member accepts an obligation to serve in the Pennsylvania National Guard for a period of six years and has not accepted an obligation under Subch. A.1 (relating to Military Family Education Program) for the same six-year period.(2.1) If the eligible member is a member of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces, the member accepts an obligation to serve in the United States Armed Forces for a period of eight years.* * *(c.1) Successive certificate.--Upon completion of [a six-year] an obligation for which an eligible member received an educational assistance grant certificate of eligibility, an eligible member may receive successive educational assistance grant certificates of eligibility for a successive [six-year] commitment.(d) Retention of benefit.--A member who receives an other than dishonorable discharge before completing [their six-year] the applicable service obligation shall remain eligible for the earned proportional share of an educational assistance grant under this subchapter if the member meets all eligibility requirements outlined in subsections (a) and (b), except for continued membership in the Pennsylvania National Guard or in a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces. The former member must begin a course of study within two years of [their] 20260HB2323PN3098 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 discharge, with the program scheduled to be completed no later than six years after the date of discharge, and must also meet one of the following additional eligibility conditions:* * *(2) the member was discharged at the convenience of the department or the Pennsylvania National Guard or the United States Department of Defense; or* * *Section 3. Sections 3203, 3204(b) and 3205(c)(2) of Title 51 are amended to read:§ 3203. Certification of eligibility.(a) Pennsylvania National Guard.--The department shall certify members of the Pennsylvania National Guard as eligible to participate in the program who meet the eligibility criteria set forth in section 3202 (relating to eligibility) and shall provide the agency with a certificate of eligibility for an eligible member.(b) Reserve components.--The Adjutant General shall consult with the United States Department of Defense in determining any additional eligibility criteria for members of reserve components of the United States Armed Forces, including retention of benefits, recoupment of grant payments and forgiveness of recoupment. The department shall provide the agency with a certificate of eligibility for an eligible member.§ 3204. Grants.* * *(b) Promissory notes.--Upon the receipt of the grant, an eligible member shall sign a promissory note obligating the eligible member to repay the full amount of the grant if the eligible member fails to fulfill the service obligation under 20260HB2323PN3098 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section [3207(a)] 3207(c) (relating to recoupment of grant payments).§ 3205. Amount of grants.* * *(c) Other grants and financial aid.--* * *(2) Prior to making a grant under this subchapter, the approved institution of higher learning shall first consider any Federal tuition assistance received by the eligible member and then shall award a grant under this subchapter if the eligible member requires additional financial aid to cover the costs of attendance for an approved program of higher education. A grant under this subchapter shall be paid or refunded to the eligible member for approved costs of attendance. Grants authorized under this subchapter shall be reduced so that the total of all Federal and State military education benefits, as administered by the Pennsylvania National Guard or a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces, as applicable, do not exceed 100% of the costs of attendance.* * *Section 4. Section 3206(b) of Title 51 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3206. Limitations.* * *[(b) Active duty.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) or (3), no grant payments shall be made under this subchapter except during the eligible member's term of service as a member in good standing of the Pennsylvania National Guard.20260HB2323PN3098 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For eligible members who were called or ordered to active Federal service or active State duty under section 508 (relating to active State duty for emergency) after September 11, 2001, the deadline for making grant payments shall be extended for one additional month for each month or part of month of such service after the eligible member is discharged or released under other than dishonorable conditions from the Pennsylvania National Guard.(3) For eligible members discharged because of a disability incurred in the line of duty who are eligible under section 3202(c) (relating to eligibility), the deadline for making grant payments shall be:(i) Six years after the eligible member's medical discharge for members discharged for a medical disability on or after the effective date of this paragraph unless extended under section 3202 (c)(6).(ii) Six years following the effective date of this paragraph for eligible members discharged for a medical disability after September 11, 2001, and before the effective date of this paragraph unless extended under section 3202 (c)(6).](b.1) Active duty.--(1) For eligible members who are members of the Pennsylvania National Guard:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) or (iii), grant payments may be made only during the eligible member's term of service as a member in good standing of the Pennsylvania National Guard.(ii) If an eligible member was called or ordered to active Federal service or active State duty under section 20260HB2323PN3098 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 508 (relating to active duty for emergency) after September 11, 2001, the deadline for making grant payments shall be extended by one month for each month or part of a month of that service, beginning after the member's discharge or release under conditions other than dishonorable from the Pennsylvania National Guard.(iii) For an eligible member discharged for a disability incurred in the line of duty, the deadline for making grant payments is six years from the date of the member's medical discharge, including members medically discharged after September 11, 2001.(2) For eligible members who are members of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) or ( iii), grant payments may be made only during the eligible member's term of service as a member in good standing of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces.(ii) If an eligible member served on active duty after September 11, 2001, the deadline for making grant payments shall be extended by one month for each month or part of a month of that service, beginning after the member's discharge or release under conditions other than dishonorable from service in the United States Armed Forces.(iii) For an eligible member discharged for a disability incurred in the line of duty, the deadline for making grant payments is six years from the date of the member's medical discharge, including members medically discharged after September 11, 2001.20260HB2323PN3098 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 5. Section 3207 of Title 51, amended July 7, 2025 (P.L.108, No.32), is amended to read:§ 3207. Recoupment of grant payments.[(a) General rule.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an eligible member who fails to meet the six-year service obligation of this subchapter or to meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General or the agency is liable to the Commonwealth for repayment of all or part of any grant payments made. The Adjutant General shall notify the agency if an eligible member fails to complete the service obligation, and the promissory note under section 3204(b) (relating to grants) shall be repaid by the eligible member upon demand by the agency on a schedule as the agency may determine.(2) Notwithstanding section 3204(b), an eligible member who fails to meet the six-year service obligation of this subchapter or meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General shall only be liable to the agency for a proportional share of the promissory note under section 3204(b). The agency shall reduce the amount owed by an eligible member based off the time of service obligation completed.(b) Forgiveness of recoupment.--The Adjutant General shall notify the agency and the agency shall forgive recoupment of all or part of an eligible member's grant payments if the Adjutant General determines that the eligible member's failure to fulfill the six-year service obligation was the result of one of the following:20260HB2323PN3098 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Death.(2.1) Discharge because of a medical determination that is not due to the eligible member's misconduct.(3.1) Discharge at the convenience of the department or the Pennsylvania National Guard.(4) The existence of other compelling circumstances that warrant forgiveness.](c) Recoupment.--(1) For an eligible member who is a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), an eligible member who fails to meet the six-year service obligation under this subchapter or to meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General or the agency is liable to the Commonwealth for repayment of all or part of any grant payments made. The Adjutant General shall notify the agency if an eligible member fails to complete the service obligation, and the promissory note under section 3204(b) (relating to grants) shall be repaid by the eligible member upon demand by the agency on a schedule the agency determines.(ii) Notwithstanding section 3204(b), an eligible member who fails to meet the six-year service obligation under this subchapter or to meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General is liable only for a proportional share of the promissory note under section 3204(b). The agency shall reduce the amount owed based on the portion of the service obligation completed.(2) For an eligible member who is a member of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces:20260HB2323PN3098 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), an eligible member who fails to meet the eight-year service obligation under this subchapter or to meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General or the agency is liable to the Commonwealth for repayment of all or part of any grant payments made. The Adjutant General shall notify the agency if an eligible member fails to complete the service obligation, and the promissory note under section 3204(b) shall be repaid by the eligible member upon demand by the agency on a schedule the agency determines.(ii) Notwithstanding section 3204(b), an eligible member who fails to meet the eight-year service obligation under this subchapter or to meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General is liable only for a proportional share of the promissory note under section 3204(b). The agency shall reduce the amount owed based on the portion of the service obligation completed.(d) Forgiveness of recoupment.--(1) For an eligible member who is a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard, the Adjutant General shall notify the agency, and the agency shall forgive recoupment of all or part of the eligible member's grant payments if the Adjutant General determines that the eligible member's failure to fulfill the six-year service obligation was the result of one of the following:(i) Death.(ii) Discharge because of a medical determination that is not due to the eligible member's misconduct.20260HB2323PN3098 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Discharge at the convenience of the department or the Pennsylvania National Guard.(iv) Other compelling circumstances that warrant forgiveness.(2) For an eligible member who is a member of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces, the Adjutant General shall notify the agency, and the agency shall forgive recoupment of all or part of the eligible member's grant payments if the Adjutant General determines that the eligible member's failure to fulfill the eight-year service obligation was the result of one of the following:(i) Death.(ii) Discharge because of a medical determination that is not due to the eligible member's misconduct.(iii) Discharge at the convenience of the United States Department of Defense.(iv) Other compelling circumstances that warrant forgiveness.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2323PN3098 - 11 - 12345678910111213141516171819